Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 3, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from  the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the Oregon Business Development  De-
partment, for the following purposes:
[(1) Operations ...........................................$ 10,938,127]
(1) Operations................................. $ 11,300,053
(2) Business, innovation
[and trade ............................................$ 83,591,268]
and trade................................... $ 84,540,852
[(3) Infrastructure......................................$ 4,384,506]
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $ 4,482,133
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office ....... $ 1,419,830
SECTION 2.
 Section 4, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund, to the Department of Education, for the State School  Fund,
the amount of [ $589,526,746] $650,508,965.
SECTION 3.  Section 5, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund, to the office of the Governor, the amount  of [ $4,552,709]
$4,661,117 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 4.  Section 6, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish a  process for al-
locating available moneys in the Administrative  Services Economic Development Fund on a quar-
terly basis to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 1 to  13 [of this 2021 Act ], chapter 661,
Oregon Laws 2021. The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in  any quarter, the moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are  insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to 13 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 661,  Oregon Laws 2021,  or any other 2021 Act, prior
to making any other allocations pursuant to sections  1 to 13 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 661, Oregon
Laws 2021, the department shall satisfy lottery bond debt service obligations in the  amount of
[$278,511,961] $273,885,133 for outstanding lottery bonds.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5703 (SB 5703-A) Page 1
(3) After the lottery bond debt service  obligations described in subsection (2) of this section are
satisfied, if the remaining  moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund are  insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations made by
sections 1 to 13 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 661, Oregon  Laws 2021, the department shall reduce the
quarterly allocations not described in subsection (2) of this section  proportionately in amounts suf-
ficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 5.  Section 7, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, from the Administrative
Services Economic Development  Fund, to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the
amount of [ $278,511,961] $273,885,133 for the purpose of paying, when due, the principal, interest and
premium, if any, on outstanding lottery bonds, as described  in section 6 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter
661, Oregon Laws 2021 .
SECTION 6.  Section 9, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  Notwithstanding  and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for a percentage-based
transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the  amount allocated from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Problem Gambling Treatment Fund  is
[$16,514,510] $16,542,526.
SECTION 7.  Section 13, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  Notwithstanding and in lieu of the allocation described  in section 44, chapter 355,
Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 1, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021, the amount allocated  from the Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund to the Employer Incentive Fund is [ $12,665,769] $15,335,236.
SECTION 8.  Section 14, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  There are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Veterans’  Ser-
vices Fund, to the Veterans’ Department  of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lottery Fund, the following
amounts for the following purposes:
[(1) Veterans’ Services Program ............ $ 12,628,046]
(1) Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 12,863,062
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ................................................$ 7,474,669
(3) National Service
Organizations ..................................... $ 497,880
SECTION 9.
 Section 14a, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 14a.  There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  from the Veterans’ Ser-
vices Fund, to  the Bureau of Labor and Industries, the amount of [ $261,416] $270,809 for veterans’
employment apprenticeship outreach and coordination.
SECTION 10.  Section 14c, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 14c. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Veterans’ Services
Fund, to the Oregon Health Authority,  [ the amount of $2,127,476 for veterans’ behavioral health ser-
vices.] the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Veterans’ behavioral
health services .......................... $ 2,127,476
(2) Veterans’ dental program ......... $ 1,000,000
SECTION 11.  Section 17, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 17.  There are allocated to the Department of Public Safety Standards and  Training , for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the  Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) Criminal justice training
[and standards operations ................ $ 43,257,427]
and standards operations.......... $ 44,416,940
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ........ $ 279,677
SECTION 12.
 Section 23, chapter 661, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5703 (SB 5703-A) Page 2
Sec. 23.  (1) There is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $36,000,000.
(2) There is  allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for mental health treatment or for pur-
poses related to alcohol and drug  abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services, for
the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $18,000,000.
(3) There is allocated to the  Oregon Health Authority, for the health systems division, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount  of $4,500,000 for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
from the  Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of [ $249,360,000] $250,527,400, for deposit into the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund.
(5) There  is allocated to the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $13,500,000.
SECTION 13. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 4, 2022
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5703 (SB 5703-A) Page 3